Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.630

Payment violations—Recovery by department—Charges to depositors.

When a violation has occurred which results in improper payment or nonpayment and a claim is made to the department and the payment is secured through the actions of the department the following charges will be made to the depositor for the action of the department in the matter:

(1) When reported within thirty days from time of default, no charge.

(2) When reported thirty days to one hundred eighty days from time of default, five percent.

(3) When reported after one hundred eighty days from time of default, ten percent.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 35.]